Illinois, session 104th, SB974.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sexual Harassment Victim Representation Act 5is amended by changing Section 3-1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 61/3-1)7    Sec. 3-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Sexual Harassment Victim Representation Act. References in 9this Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20.)